New York, session 2025-2026, A2622.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19.09 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for 4 providers who operate in rural locations that take into account the 5 extra challenges encountered by such providers, including but not limit- 6 ed to, increased and additional expenses. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 9 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 10 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 11 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03790-01-5